Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-107 Workers' compensation rate
analysis. There shall be established within the insurance division a unit
to assist the commissioner in workers' compensation insurance rate-filing and
rate-making proceedings under article 14. The commissioner may employ or
contract actuaries, accountants, investigators, clerks, stenographers, and
other assistants who shall not be subject to chapter 76. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Cross References

Limitation on charges, see §431:10C-308.5.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next